ru: Состав средства для снятия лака: Без ацетона; Высокое содержание ацетона (>50%); Низкое содержание ацетона (≤50%); Увлажнение; На масляной основе; Чистый ацетон (100%); На основе сои; Другой
zh-CN: 指甲油卸妆液配方: 无丙酮; 高丙酮 (>50%); 低丙酮 (≤50%); 补水; 油性; 纯丙酮 (100%); 大豆基; 其他
fi: Kynsilakan poistoaineen koostumus: Asetoniton; Runsas asetoni (>50%); Vähän asetonia (≤50%); Kosteuttava; Öljypohjainen; Puhdas asetoni (100%); Soijapohjainen; Muu
pt-BR: Formulação do removedor de esmalte: Sem acetona; Alta concentração de acetona (>50%); Baixa concentração de acetona (≤50%); Hidratante; À base de óleo; Acetona pura (100%); À base de soja; Outro
sk-SK: Zloženie odstraňovača laku: Bez acetónu; Vysoký obsah acetónu (>50%); Nízky obsah acetónu (≤50%); Zvlhčujúci; Na olejovej báze; Čistý acetón (100%); Na sójovej báze; Iné
nl: Lakverwijderaar formulering: Acetonvrij; Hoog acetongehalte (>50%); Laag acetongehalte (≤50%); Vochtinbrengend; Op olie gebaseerd; Pure aceton (100%); Op sojabasis; Andere
ja: ポリッシュリムーバー配合: アセトンフリー; 高濃度アセトン（50%以上）; 低濃度アセトン（50%以下）; モイスチャライジング; 油性; 純アセトン（100%）; 大豆ベース; その他
it: Formulazione del rimuovi smalto: Senza acetone; Alto contenuto di acetone (>50%); Basso contenuto di acetone (≤50%); Emolliente; A base oleosa; Acetone puro (100%); A base di soia; Altro
ko: 폴리시 리무버 제형: 아세톤 프리; 고농도 아세톤 (>50%); 저농도 아세톤 (≤50%); 보습; 오일 기반; 순수 아세톤 (100%); 대두 베이스; 기타
hr-HR: Formulacija sredstva za skidanje laka: Bez acetona; Visok udio acetona (>50%); Nizak udio acetona (≤50%); Vlaženje; Na bazi ulja; Čisti aceton (100%); Na bazi soje; Ostalo
de: Nagellackentferner-Formulierung: Acetonfrei; Hoher Acetongehalt (>50%); Niedriger Acetongehalt (≤50%); Befeuchtend; Auf Öl-Basis; Reines Aceton (100%); Auf Sojabasis; Sonstiges
hu: Körömlakklemosó összetétele: Acetonmentes; Magas acetontartalmú (>50%); Alacsony acetontartalmú (≤50%); Nedvesítés; Olajalapú; Tiszta aceton (100%); Szója alapú; Egyéb
zh-TW: 指甲油卸除劑配方: 無丙酮; 高丙酮 (>50%); 低丙酮 (≤50%); 保濕; 油基; 純丙酮 (100%); 大豆配方; 其他
lt-LT: Lako valiklio formuluotė: Be acetono; Daug acetono (>50%); Mažai acetono (≤50%); Drėkinamasis; Aliejinis; Grynas acetonas (100%); Sojų pagrindu; Kita
el: Σύνθεση αφαιρετικού βερνικιού: Χωρίς ασετόν; Υψηλή ασετόν (>50%); Χαμηλή ασετόν (≤50%); Για ενυδάτωση; Με βάση το λάδι; Καθαρή ασετόν (100%); Με βάση τη σόγια; Άλλο
fr: Formule du dissolvant: Sans acétone; Haute teneur en acétone (>50%); Faible teneur en acétone (≤50%); Hydratant; À base d'huile; Acétone pure (100%); À base de soja; Autre
bg-BG: Формула на лакочистителя: Без ацетон; Висок ацетон (>50%); Нисък ацетон (≤50%); Овлажняване; На маслена основа; Чист ацетон (100%); На соева основа; Други
pt-PT: Formulação do removedor de verniz: Sem acetona; Alta acetona (>50%); Baixa acetona (≤50%); Umectante; À base de óleo; Acetona pura (100%); À base de soja; Outro
es: Formulación del removedor de esmalte: Sin acetona; Alto contenido de acetona (>50%); Bajo contenido de acetona (≤50%); Hidratante; A base de aceite; Acetona pura (100%); Base de soya; Otros
en: Polish remover formulation: Acetone-free; High acetone (>50%); Low acetone (≤50%); Moisturizing; Oil-based; Pure acetone (100%); Soy-based; Other
th: สูตรน้ำยาล้างยาทาเล็บ: ไม่มีอะซีโตน; อะซีโตนสูง (>50%); อะซีโตนต่ำ (≤50%); เติมความชุ่มชื้น; สูตรน้ำมัน; อะซีโตนบริสุทธิ์ (100%); สูตรถั่วเหลือง; อื่นๆ
nb: Neglelakkfjernerformulering: Acetonfri; Høy aceton (>50%); Lav aceton (≤50%); Fuktighetsgivende; Oljebasert; Ren aceton (100%); Soyabasert; Annet
da: Lakfjernerformulering: Acetonfri; Høj aceton (>50%); Lav aceton (≤50%); Fugtgivende; Oliebaseret; Ren aceton (100%); Sojabaseret; Andet
sv: Nagellacksborttagningsformulering: Acetonfri; Hög aceton (>50%); Låg aceton (≤50%); Återfuktande; Oljebaserad; Ren aceton (100%); Sojabaserad; Övrigt
vi: Công thức tẩy sơn móng tay: Không acetone; Acetone cao (>50%); Acetone thấp (≤50%); Dưỡng ẩm; Có dầu; Acetone tinh khiết (100%); Gốc đậu nành; Khác
ro-RO: Formulă soluție de îndepărtare a ojei: Fără acetonă; Acetonă mare (>50%); Acetonă redusă (≤50%); Menține hidratarea; Pe bază de ulei; Acetonă pură (100%); Pe bază de soia; Altele
sl-SI: Formulacija odstranjevalca laka: Brez acetona; Visoka vsebnost acetona (>50%); Nizka vsebnost acetona (≤50%); Vlaženje; Na oljni osnovi; Čisti aceton (100%); Na sojini osnovi; Drugo
pl: Formulacja zmywacza do paznokci: Bez acetonu; Wysoka zawartość acetonu (>50%); Niska zawartość acetonu (≤50%); Nawilżający; Na bazie oleju; Czysty aceton (100%); Na bazie soi; Inne
cs: Složení odstraňovače laku: Bez acetonu; Vysoký obsah acetonu (>50%); Nízký obsah acetonu (≤50%); Zvlhčující; Na bázi oleje; Čistý aceton (100%); Na sójové bázi; Jiné
tr: Oje çıkarıcı formülasyonu: Asetonsuz; Yüksek aseton (>%50); Düşük aseton (≤%50); Nemlendirici; Yağ bazlı; Saf aseton (%100); Soya bazlı; Diğer